lexd_components/hyw-pronouns.lexd
#!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
#!!!  M O R P H O T A C T I C S  !!!
#!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

# Pronouns from Hagopian grammar

########################################
########################################
########################################
### PRONOUN PARADIGMS
########################################
########################################
########################################
########################################

# All the pronouns
PATTERNS
PersonalPronoun
SubstantivePronoun
ReciprocalPronoun

#ինքզինքս ինքզինքիս
ReflexivePronoun  CaseRegI? (Def|Poss)?
ReflexivePronoun  PossPl CaseRegPostPluralPoss? (Def|Poss)?
ReflexivePronoun  InsReg PossPl  (Def|Poss)?

#ինքնիրմէ ինքնիրեն 
ReflexivePronounInkIr (CaseBoundaryM CaseRegOblique)? (Def|Poss)?
ReflexivePronounInkIr [<acc>:են] (Def|Poss)?

ReflexivePronounArchaic

DemonstrativePronounDeterminer (Def|Poss)?  


# relative pronouns can function also as wh-word
[որ<prn>:] ([<rel>:]|[<itg>:])   RelativePronounThatInflected ((Def Def?)|Poss)?   # Double Def is because of attributive like որունն է 
[ով<prn>:] ([<rel>:]|[<itg>:])   RelativePronounWhoInflected ((Def Def?)|Poss)?   # Double Def is because of attributive like որունն է 
[ուր<prn>:] ([<rel>:]|[<itg>:])   RelativePronounWhereInflected ((Def Def?)|Poss)?   # Double Def is because of attributive like որունն է 
[երբ<prn>:երբ] ([<rel>:]|[<itg>:]) # inflection is in nominal paradigm because takes -van

# quantifiers are in the noun paradigm because use the same declensions

DeclinedQuestionArchaic # Dir/LR

# Adverbial pronouns
AdverbialPronounSpecialDeclined
# the pronominal adverbs that take regular declension are in the noun paradigm lexd

##############
##############
##############
#### Personal Pronoun morphemes
##############
##############


### Based on Hagopian 2007 page 354

LEXICON PersonalPronoun
ես<prn><nom><sg><p1>:ես
ես<prn><gen><sg><p1>:իմ
ես<prn><gen><sg><p1>:իմին  # Dir/LR
ես<prn><dat><sg><p1>:ինծի
ես<prn><acc><sg><p1>:զիս  # Dir/LR
ես<prn><acc><sg><p1>:ինձ  
ես<prn><acc><sg><p1>:ինծ  # Dir/LR
ես<prn><abl><sg><p1>:ինձմէ
ես<prn><abl><sg><p1>:ինծմէ  # Dir/LR
ես<prn><abl><sg><p1>:ինձանից  # Dir/LR  Eastern code-switching
ես<prn><abl><sg><p1>:ինձնից  # Dir/LR   Eastern code-switching
ես<prn><ins><sg><p1>:ինձմով
ես<prn><ins><sg><p1>:ինծմով  # Dir/LR
ես<prn><ins><sg><p1>:ինձանով  # Dir/LR  Eastern code-switching
ես<prn><ins><sg><p1>:ինձնով  # Dir/LR  Eastern code-switching

մենք<prn><nom><pl><p1>:մենք
մենք<prn><nom><pl><p1>:մեք  # Dir/LR
մենք<prn><gen><pl><p1>:մեր
մենք<prn><gen><pl><p1>:մերին  # Dir/LR
մենք<prn><dat><pl><p1>:մեզի
մենք<prn><acc><pl><p1>:մեզ
մենք<prn><acc><pl><p1>:զմեզ  # Dir/LR
մենք<prn><abl><pl><p1>:մեզմէ
մենք<prn><abl><pl><p1>:մեզանից  # Dir/LR  Eastern code-switching
մենք<prn><abl><pl><p1>:մենէ  # Dir/LR  
մենք<prn><abl><pl><p1>:մեզնից  # Dir/LR  Eastern code-switching
մենք<prn><ins><pl><p1>:մեզմով
մենք<prn><ins><pl><p1>:մեզանով  # Dir/LR  Eastern code-switching
մենք<prn><ins><pl><p1>:մեզնով  # Dir/LR  Eastern code-switching
մենք<prn><loc><pl><p1>:մեզանում  # Dir/LR  Eastern code-switching
մենք<prn><loc><pl><p1>:մերում  # Dir/LR  Eastern code-switching

դուն<prn><nom><sg><p2>:դուն
դուն<prn><nom><sg><p2>:դու    # Dir/LR  Eastern code-switching
դուն<prn><gen><sg><p2>:քու
դուն<prn><gen><sg><p2>:քո   # Dir/LR  Eastern code-switching
դուն<prn><gen><sg><p2>:քեզին  # Dir/LR
դուն<prn><dat><sg><p2>:քեզի
դուն<prn><acc><sg><p2>:քեզ 
դուն<prn><acc><sg><p2>:զքեզ  # Dir/LR
դուն<prn><abl><sg><p2>:քեզմէ
դուն<prn><abl><sg><p2>:քեզանից  # Dir/LR  Eastern code-switching
դուն<prn><abl><sg><p2>:քեզնից  # Dir/LR  Eastern code-switching
դուն<prn><abl><sg><p2>:քենէ  # Dir/LR 
դուն<prn><ins><sg><p2>:քեզմով
դուն<prn><ins><sg><p2>:քեզանով  # Dir/LR  Eastern code-switching
դուն<prn><ins><sg><p2>:քեզնով  # Dir/LR  Eastern code-switching

դուք<prn><nom><pl><p2>:դուք
դուք<prn><gen><pl><p2>:ձեր
դուք<prn><gen><pl><p2>:ձերին  # Dir/LR
դուք<prn><dat><pl><p2>:ձեզի
դուք<prn><acc><pl><p2>:ձեզ 
դուք<prn><acc><pl><p2>:զձեզ  # Dir/LR
դուք<prn><abl><pl><p2>:ձեզմէ
դուք<prn><abl><pl><p2>:ձեզանից  # Dir/LR  Eastern code-switching
դուք<prn><abl><pl><p2>:ձեզնից  # Dir/LR  Eastern code-switching
դուք<prn><ins><pl><p2>:ձեզմով
դուք<prn><ins><pl><p2>:ձեզանով  # Dir/LR  Eastern code-switching
դուք<prn><ins><pl><p2>:ձեզնով  # Dir/LR  Eastern code-switching
դուք<prn><loc><pl><p1>:ձեզանում  # Dir/LR  Eastern code-switching

ան<prn><nom_acc><sg><p3>:ան
ան<prn><nom><sg><p3>:նա # Dir/LR   Eastern code-switching
ան<prn><nom><sg><p3>:նէ # Dir/LR
ան<prn><dat_gen><sg><p3>:անոր
ան<prn><dat_gen><sg><p3>:անորին  # Dir/LR
ան<prn><gen><sg><p3>:նրա  # Dir/LR  Eastern code-switching
ան<prn><dat_gen><sg><p3>:Նորին # Dir/LR royal pronoun
ան<prn><dat_gen><sg><p3>:նորա  # Dir/LR   
ան<prn><dat_gen><sg><p3>:ներա  # Dir/LR   
ան<prn><dat_gen><sg><p3>:անոր
ան<prn><dat><sg><p3>:նրան  # Dir/LR  Eastern code-switching
ան<prn><dat><sg><p3>:նմա  # Dir/LR  
ան<prn><acc><sg><p3>:զանի # Dir/LR
ան<prn><abl><sg><p3>:անորմէ
ան<prn><abl><sg><p3>:նրանից  # Dir/LR  Eastern code-switching
ան<prn><ins><sg><p3>:անորմով
ան<prn><ins><sg><p3>:նրանով  # Dir/LR  Eastern code-switching
ան<prn><loc><sg><p3>:նրանում  # Dir/LR  Eastern code-switching

անոնք<prn><nom_acc><pl><p3>:անոնք
անոնք<prn><nom_acc><pl><p3>:նրանք  # Dir/LR  Eastern code-switching
անոնք<prn><dat_gen><pl><p3>:անոնց
անոնք<prn><dat><pl><p3>:անոնցին  # Dir/LR
անոնք<prn><acc_dat><pl><p3>:նրանց  # Dir/LR  Eastern code-switching
անոնք<prn><acc><pl><p3>:զանոնք  # Dir/LR
անոնք<prn><abl><pl><p3>:անոնցմէ
անոնք<prn><abl><pl><p3>:նրանցից  # Dir/LR  Eastern code-switching
անոնք<prn><ins><pl><p3>:անոնցմով
անոնք<prn><ins><pl><p3>:նրանցով  # Dir/LR  Eastern code-switching


ինքը<prn><log><nom><sg><p3><def>:ինքը #Hagopian had ինք but I find that odd
ինքը<prn><log><nom><sg><p3>:ինք # Dir/LR
ինքը<prn><log><nom><sg><p3>:ինքն # Dir/LR
ինքը<prn><log><gen><sg><p3>:իր
ինքը<prn><log><gen><sg><p3>:իրենին  # Dir/LR
ինքը<prn><log><gen><sg><p3>:իւր  # Dir/LR
ինքը<prn><log><gen><sg><p3>:ւիւր  # Dir/LR
ինքը<prn><log><acc_dat><sg><p3>:իրեն
ինքը<prn><log><acc><sg><p3>:զինք # Dir/LR
ինքը<prn><log><acc><sg><p3><def>:զինքը # Dir/LR
ինքը<prn><log><acc><sg><p3><def>:զինքն # Dir/LR
ինքը<prn><log><abl><sg><p3>:իրմէ
ինքը<prn><log><abl><sg><p3>:իրենից  # Dir/LR  Eastern code-switching
ինքը<prn><log><ins><sg><p3>:իրմով 
ինքը<prn><log><ins><sg><p3>:իրենով  # Dir/LR  Eastern code-switching


իրենք<prn><log><nom_acc><pl><p3>:իրենք
իրենք<prn><log><dat_gen><pl><p3>:իրենց
իրենք<prn><log><gen><pl><p3>:իրենցին  # Dir/LR
իրենք<prn><log><acc><pl><p3>:զիրենք  # Dir/LR
իրենք<prn><log><abl><pl><p3>:իրենցմէ
իրենք<prn><log><abl><pl><p3>:իրենցից  # Dir/LR  Eastern code-switching
իրենք<prn><log><ins><pl><p3>:իրենցմով
իրենք<prn><log><ins><pl><p3>:իրենցով  # Dir/LR  Eastern code-switching


##############
##############
##############
#### Substantive Pronoun morphemes
##############
##############


### Based on Hagopian 2007 page 354, meaning of possessive substantive like 'mine'


LEXICON SubstantivePronoun
#single possessor, single object
իմս<prn><subs><px1sg><sg><nom_acc>:իմս # mine
իմս<prn><subs><px1sg><sg><nom_acc>:իմինս # Dir/LR
իմս<prn><subs><px1sg><sg><gen_dat>:իմինիս 
իմս<prn><subs><px1sg><sg><abl>:իմինէս 
իմս<prn><subs><px1sg><sg><ins>:իմինովս 

քուկդ<prn><subs><px2sg><sg><nom_acc>:քուկդ # yours
քուկդ<prn><subs><px2sg><sg><nom_acc>:քուկինդ # Dir/LR
քուկդ<prn><subs><px2sg><sg><gen_dat>:քուկինիդ
քուկդ<prn><subs><px2sg><sg><abl>:քուկինէդ 
քուկդ<prn><subs><px2sg><sg><ins>:քուկինովդ 

անորը<prn><subs><px3sg><sg><nom_acc>:անորը # its
անորը<prn><subs><px3sg><sg><nom_acc>:անորն # Dir/LR
անորը<prn><subs><px3sg><sg><nom_acc>:անորինը
անորը<prn><subs><px3sg><sg><nom_acc>:անորինն # Dir/LR
անորը<prn><subs><px3sg><sg><gen_dat>:անորինը
նորա<prn><subs><px3sg><sg><gen_dat>:նորային # Dir/LR
անորը<prn><subs><px3sg><sg><gen_dat>:անորինն # Dir/LR
անորը<prn><subs><px3sg><sg><nom_acc>:անորն # Dir/LR
անորը<prn><subs><px3sg><sg><gen_dat>:անորինն # Dir/LR
անորը<prn><subs><px3sg><sg><abl>:անորինէն 
անորը<prn><subs><px3sg><sg><ins>:անորինով 
անորը<prn><subs><px3sg><sg><ins><def>:անորինովը
անորը<prn><subs><px3sg><sg><ins><def>:անորինովն # Dir/LR

իրենը<prn><log><subs><px3sg><sg><nom_acc>:իրենը # hers
իրենը<prn><log><subs><px3sg><sg><nom_acc>:իրենն # Dir/LR
իրենը<prn><log><subs><px3sg><sg><gen_dat>:իրենինը
իրենը<prn><log><subs><px3sg><sg><gen_dat>:իրենինն # Dir/LR
իրենը<prn><log><subs><px3sg><sg><nom_acc>:իրենն # Dir/LR
իրենը<prn><log><subs><px3sg><sg><gen_dat>:իրենինն # Dir/LR

իրենը<prn><log><subs><px3sg><sg><abl>:իներինէն 
իրենը<prn><log><subs><px3sg><sg><ins>:իներինով 
իրենը<prn><log><subs><px3sg><sg><ins><def>:իներինովը
իրենը<prn><log><subs><px3sg><sg><ins><def>:իներինովն # Dir/LR

#single possessor, many objects
իմս<prn><subs><px1sg><pl><nom_acc>:իմիններս
իմս<prn><subs><px1sg><pl><gen_dat>:իմիններուս 
իմս<prn><subs><px1sg><pl><abl>:իմիններէս 
իմս<prn><subs><px1sg><pl><ins>:իմիններովս 

իմս<prn><subs><px2sg><pl><nom_acc>:քուկիններդ
իմս<prn><subs><px2sg><pl><gen_dat>:քուկիններուդ 
իմս<prn><subs><px2sg><pl><abl>:քուկիններէդ 
իմս<prn><subs><px2sg><pl><ins>:քուկիններովդ 

անորը<prn><subs><px3sg><pl><nom_acc>:անորները 
անորը<prn><subs><px3sg><pl><nom_acc>:անորներն # Dir/LR 
անորը<prn><subs><px3sg><pl><gen_dat>:անորներուն
անորը<prn><subs><px3sg><pl><abl>:անորներէն 
անորը<prn><subs><px3sg><pl><ins>:անորներով 
անորը<prn><subs><px3sg><pl><ins><def>:անորներովը
անորը<prn><subs><px3sg><pl><ins><def>:անորներովն # Dir/LR 

իրենը<prn><log><subs><px3sg><pl><nom_acc>:իրենները  
իրենը<prn><log><subs><px3sg><pl><nom_acc>:իրեններն # Dir/LR   
իրենը<prn><log><subs><px3sg><pl><gen_dat>:իրեններուն
իրենը<prn><log><subs><px3sg><pl><abl>:իրեններէն 
իրենը<prn><log><subs><px3sg><pl><ins>:իրեններով 
իրենը<prn><log><subs><px3sg><pl><ins><def>:իրեններովը 
իրենը<prn><log><subs><px3sg><pl><ins><def>:իրեններովն # Dir/LR 

#many possessors, single object
մերինը<prn><subs><px1pl><sg><nom_acc>:մերինը # our
մերինը<prn><subs><px1pl><sg><nom_acc>:մերային # Dir/LR 
մերինը<prn><subs><px1pl><sg><nom_acc>:մերինն # Dir/LR 
մերինը<prn><subs><px1pl><sg><nom_acc>:մերը # Dir/LR
մերինը<prn><subs><px1pl><sg><nom_acc>:մերն # Dir/LR
մերինը<prn><subs><px1pl><sg><gen_dat>:մերինին 
մերինը<prn><subs><px1pl><sg><abl>:մերինէն 
մերինը<prn><subs><px1pl><sg><ins>:մերինով 
մերինը<prn><subs><px1pl><sg><ins><def>:մերինովը
մերինը<prn><subs><px1pl><sg><ins><def>:մերինովն # Dir/LR 

ձերինը<prn><subs><px2pl><sg><nom_acc>:ձերինը # yours
ձերինը<prn><subs><px2pl><sg><nom_acc>:ձերինն # Dir/LR 
ձերինը<prn><subs><px2pl><sg><nom_acc>:ձերը # Dir/LR
ձերինը<prn><subs><px2pl><sg><nom_acc>:ձերն # Dir/LR 
ձերինը<prn><subs><px2pl><sg><gen_dat>:ձերինին 
ձերինը<prn><subs><px2pl><sg><abl>:ձերինէն 
ձերինը<prn><subs><px2pl><sg><ins>:ձերինով 
ձերինը<prn><subs><px2pl><sg><ins><def>:ձերինովը
ձերինը<prn><subs><px2pl><sg><ins><def>:ձերինովն # Dir/LR 

անոնցը<prn><subs><px3pl><sg><nom_acc>:անոնցը # theirs
անոնցը<prn><subs><px3pl><sg><nom_acc>:անոնցինը # Dir/LR
անոնցը<prn><subs><px3pl><sg><nom_acc>:անոնցն # Dir/LR 
անոնցը<prn><subs><px3pl><sg><nom_acc>:անոնցինն # Dir/LR 
անոնցը<prn><subs><px3pl><sg><gen_dat>:անոնցինին
անոնցը<prn><subs><px3pl><sg><abl>:անոնցինէն 
անոնցը<prn><subs><px3pl><sg><ins>:անոնցինով 
անոնցը<prn><subs><px3pl><sg><ins><def>:անոնցինովը
անոնցը<prn><subs><px3pl><sg><ins><def>:անոնցինովն # Dir/LR 

իրենցը<prn><log><subs><px3pl><sg><nom_acc>:իրենցը  
իրենցը<prn><log><subs><px3pl><sg><nom_acc>:իրենցինը  # Dir/LR
իրենցը<prn><log><subs><px3pl><sg><nom_acc>:իրենցն # Dir/LR  
իրենցը<prn><log><subs><px3pl><sg><nom_acc>:իրենցինն # Dir/LR 
իրենցը<prn><log><subs><px3pl><sg><gen_dat>:իրենցինին
իրենցը<prn><log><subs><px3pl><sg><abl>:իրենցինէն 
իրենցը<prn><log><subs><px3pl><sg><ins>:իրենցինով 
իրենցը<prn><log><subs><px3pl><sg><ins><def>:իրենցինովը
իրենցը<prn><log><subs><px3pl><sg><ins><def>:իրենցինովն # Dir/LR 
